Washington statutes.
RCW 18.210.150

Persons exempt from licensure.

A person engaged in any of the following activities is not required to be licensed in accordance with this chapter:

(1) A licensed professional engineer, as provided in chapter 18.43 RCW, if the professional engineer performs the design work in accordance with this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter; or

(2) An employee or a subordinate of a person licensed under chapter 18.43 RCW as a professional engineer, or a person licensed under this chapter if the work is performed under the direct supervision of the engineer or licensee and does not include final design decisions.

[ 1999 c 263 s 16.]